California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) All license fees from satellite wagering that are deposited into the Fair and Exposition Fund shall be deposited in a separate account in the fund and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated from that account to the Department of Food and Agriculture, for allocation by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, at the secretary’s discretion, for the purposes set forth in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive. The concurrence of the Director of Finance shall be required for allocations pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2). Allocations pursuant to paragraphs (3) to (6), inclusive, shall be made with the concurrence of the Joint Committee on Fairs Allocation and Classification.

(1) For the repayment of the principal of, interest
 on, and costs of issuance of, and as security, including any coverage factor, pledged to the payment of, bonds issued or to be issued by a joint powers agency or other debt service or expense, including repayment of any advances made or security required by any provider of credit enhancement or liquidity for those bonds or other indebtedness or expenses of maintaining that credit enhancement or liquidity, incurred for the purpose of constructing or acquiring improvements at a fair’s racetrack inclosure, satellite wagering facilities at fairs, health and safety repair projects, or handicapped access compliance projects at fairs or for the purpose of refunding bonds or other indebtedness incurred for those purposes. As used in this paragraph, “coverage factor” means revenues in excess of the amount necessary to pay debt service on the bonds or other indebtedness, up to an amount equal to 100 percent more than the amount of that debt service, which a joint powers agency, pursuant to the resolution or indenture
 under which the bonds or other indebtedness are or will be issued, pledges as additional security for the payment of that debt service or is required to have or maintain as a condition to the issuance of additional bonds or other indebtedness. Notwithstanding any other law, at the discretion of the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, the department may also commit any funds available for allocation under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3200) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Food and Agricultural Code to complete projects funded under this paragraph in the priority described in this paragraph.

(2) For payment to the State Race Track Leasing Commission to be pledged for the repayment of debt necessary to construct a racetrack grandstand at the 22nd District Agricultural Association fairgrounds. This payment shall be made only if the Secretary of Food and Agriculture determines, annually, that all other pledged revenues have been applied to the
 repayment of that debt and have been determined by the secretary to be inadequate for that purpose.

(3) For the payment of expenses incurred in establishing and operating satellite wagering facilities at fairs.

(4) For the support of an equipment and operating fund to produce and display a consolidated California signal at satellite wagering facilities and fairs.

(5) For health and safety repair projects at fairs, which includes fire and life safety improvement projects, California Code of Regulations compliance projects, and long-term deferred maintenance projects.

(6) For the development and payment of revenue generating projects, the establishment of pilot projects to restructure the current fair system, and for projects realizing a cost savings for
 more efficient use of existing fair resources.

(b) The Secretary of Food and Agriculture shall not make an allocation for purposes of paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) until the payments required in any fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) have been funded.

(c) Pursuant to subdivision (a), the Joint Committee on Fairs Allocation and Classification shall review and concur, or not concur, with the secretary’s determination of the allocations to be made pursuant to paragraphs (3) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) in total, and the committee shall not add to, or delete projects or line items from, the proposed allocations.

(d) Approval of the Joint Committee on Fairs Allocation and Classification is deemed complete when one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The annual Budget Act is enacted.

(2) If the secretary’s recommendations are received by the Joint Committee on Fairs Allocation and Classification after the enactment of the annual Budget Act, the recommendations shall be deemed approved 30 days after they are received unless they are rejected by the committee.

(e) If the Joint Committee on Fairs Allocation and Classification does not concur with the secretary’s recommendations, the secretary may resubmit another set of recommendations pursuant to this section that considers the committee’s review and suggestions. The resubmitted recommendations shall be deemed approved 30 days after they are received by the committee.

(f) The payments required in any fiscal year for the purposes of paragraphs (1) to
 (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be made before any transfer is made pursuant to subdivision (g).

(g) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), if the revenues deposited into the separate account exceed eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) in any fiscal year, the amount in excess of eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) shall be transferred to the Fair and Exposition Fund for allocation in accordance with Section 3204 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(h) All of the costs of administering the account created by subdivision (a) shall be charged to the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 10.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19606.5.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 19641, the state shall receive as additional license fees 50 percent of any redistributable money in a parimutuel pool arising from wagers at a satellite wagering facility in the central or southern zone, subject to payment to a claimant pursuant to Section 19598, but not successfully claimed within that period, and the funds shall be deposited in the General Fund. The remaining 50 percent of redistributable money in a parimutuel pool arising from wagers at a satellite wagering facility shall be paid to a welfare fund established by the horsemen’s organization contracting with the association conducting the racing meeting for the benefit of horsemen, and that organization shall make an accounting to the board within one calendar year of the receipt of the payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1113, Sec. 1.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

19606.6.

Of the total breakage arising in a parimutuel pool which includes wagers at satellite wagering facilities in the central or southern zone, that percentage of breakage equal to the percentage that wagers placed at satellite wagering facilities constitute of the total parimutuel pool shall be distributed equally among the state as an additional license fee deposited in the General Fund, the track conducting the racing meeting as a commission, and the horsemen participating in the racing meeting in the form of purses. The remainder of the breakage shall be distributed in the same manner as breakage arising from wagers at the track conducting the racing meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 131, Sec. 15.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

19607.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 19605.8 and 19605.9, when satellite wagering is conducted on thoroughbred races at associations or fairs in the central or southern zone, an amount not to exceed 2 percent of the total amount handled by all of those satellite wagering facilities shall be deducted from the funds otherwise allocated for distribution as commissions, purses, and owners’ premiums and instead distributed to an organization formed and operated by
 one licensed association from each facility in the central and southern zones at which a thoroughbred or fair racing meeting is conducted, and the organization representing thoroughbred horsemen and horsewomen, for use in accordance with Section 19607.1.

(b) A vote of the organization representing thoroughbred horsemen and horsewomen shall constitute 50 percent of all voting interests on the board of the organization formed and operated to administer the fund. The other 50 percent of all voting interests shall be allocated equally among the other members of the organization. Any use of funds by the organization shall be approved by the affirmative vote of both (1) the organization representing thoroughbred horsemen and horsewomen, and (2) at least two of the licensed thoroughbred racing associations that are part of the organization formed pursuant to this section, provided, however, that, if there are only two licensed thoroughbred racing associations that are part of the organization formed pursuant to this section, the vote of at least one of those two licensed thoroughbred racing associations shall be sufficient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (AB 2011)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19607.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19535, the funds distributed to the organization formed pursuant to Section 19607 shall be used to pay the expenses of the organization and compensate the provider of a board-approved auxiliary facility for offsite
 stabling and training of thoroughbred horses in the central or southern zone. The organization administering the offsite stabling and vanning program shall submit its proposed financial and operational plans for the upcoming calendar year to the board for review no later than November 1 of the preceding year. Neither the organization administering the offsite stabling and vanning program nor any of the entities forming and operating the organization, except an entity operating the auxiliary offsite stabling facility where the injury occurred, shall be liable for any injury to any jockey, exercise person, owner, trainer, or any employee or agent thereof, or any horse occurring at any
 offsite stabling facility.

(b) The funds shall also be used to cover all or part of the cost of vanning thoroughbred horses from a board-approved auxiliary offsite stabling and training facility to start in a thoroughbred race at a thoroughbred or fair racing meeting in the central or southern zone. The organization shall determine the extent of and manner in which compensation will be paid for thoroughbred horses that are vanned from the auxiliary facility to the track conducting the thoroughbred or fair racing meeting, but the vanning shall be made available on a consistent and uniform basis for all thoroughbred and fair racing meetings in a given year. Neither the organization administering the offsite stabling and vanning program nor any of the entities that form and operate the organization, except an entity actually engaged in vanning horses, is liable for any injury occurring to any individual or horse during vanning from an offsite stabling facility.

(c) The auxiliary offsite stabling facilities and amenities provided for offsite stabling and training purposes shall be substantially equivalent in character to those provided by the thoroughbred racing association or fair conducting the racing meeting.

(d) In order to ensure the long-term availability of facilities for offsite stabling and training, the organization may enter into multiyear contracts for auxiliary facilities in either the central or southern zone. The organization shall submit to the board for its approval multiyear contracts it enters into with providers of auxiliary facilities for the offsite stabling and training. Contracts not disapproved by the board within 60 days of submittal to the board shall be deemed to have been approved by the board. Once a multiyear contract has been approved by the board, it shall be considered to have been approved for its duration.

(e) At the request of the board, the organization shall submit a report detailing all of its receipts and expenditures over the prior two fiscal
 years and, upon request of any party within the organization, those receipts and expenditures shall be audited by an independent third party selected by the board at the expense of the organization.

(f) In addition to the uses of funds described in subdivisions (a) and (b), the organization may use those funds to do both of the following:

(1) Maintain a reserve fund of up to 10 percent of the total estimated annual vanning and auxiliary offsite stabling costs. In addition to the reserve fund, if the funds generated for the auxiliary offsite stabling facilities and vanning are insufficient to fully cover the expenses incurred, the organization may, in the future, accumulate sufficient funds to fully cover those expenses.

(2) Pay back commissions, purses, and owners’ premiums to the extent the deductions made pursuant
 to Section 19607 exceed in any year the amount of funds necessary to achieve the objectives of the organization.

(g) The amount initially deducted and distributed to the organization shall be 2 percent of the total amount handled by satellite wagering facilities authorized under this article in the central or southern zone on thoroughbred racing, but that allocation may be adjusted by the board, in its discretion. However, the adjusted amount
 may not exceed
 2 percent of the total amount handled by satellite wagering
 facilities.

(h) The board shall reserve the right to adjudicate any disputes that arise regarding costs or other matters relating to the furnishing of offsite stabling or vanning. Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall maintain all powers necessary and proper to ensure that offsite stabling and vanning, as provided for in this chapter, is conducted in a manner that protects the public and serves the best interests of horse racing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 562, Sec. 2.   (AB 2011)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19607.2.

Notwithstanding Section 19605.8, when satellite wagering is conducted on thoroughbred races at associations or fairs in the northern zone, an amount not to exceed 2 percent of the total amount handled by all of those satellite wagering facilities shall be deducted from the funds otherwise allocated for distribution as commissions, purses, and owners’ premiums and instead be distributed to an organization formed and operated by thoroughbred racing associations, fairs conducting thoroughbred racing, and the organization representing thoroughbred horsemen and horsewomen, for use pursuant to Section 19607.3. A
 vote of the organization representing thoroughbred horsemen and horsewomen shall constitute 50 percent of all voting interests on the board of the organization formed and operated to administer the fund. The other 50 percent of all voting interests shall be allocated among thoroughbred racing associations and fairs conducting thoroughbred racing in a manner that provides meaningful representation on the governing board of the organization for thoroughbred racing associations and fairs conducting thoroughbred racing, except as provided in subdivision (h) of Section 19607.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 562, Sec. 3.   (AB 2011)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19607.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19535, the funds distributed to the organization formed pursuant to Section 19607.2 shall be used to pay the expenses of the organization and compensate the provider of a board-approved auxiliary facility for offsite stabling and training of
 thoroughbred horses in the northern zone. The organization administering the offsite stabling and vanning program shall submit its proposed financial and operational plans for the upcoming calendar year to the board for review no later than November 1 of the preceding year. Neither the organization administering the offsite stabling and vanning program nor any of the entities forming and operating the organization, except
 an entity operating the auxiliary offsite stabling facility where the injury occurred, shall be liable for any injury to any jockey, exercise person, owner, trainer, or any employee or agent thereof, or any horse occurring at any offsite stabling facility.

(b) The funds shall also be used to cover all or part of the cost of vanning thoroughbred horses from a board-approved auxiliary offsite stabling and training facility to
 start in a thoroughbred race at a thoroughbred or fair racing meeting in the northern zone. The organization shall determine the extent of and manner in which compensation will be paid for thoroughbred horses that are vanned from the auxiliary facility to the track or fair conducting the thoroughbred or fair racing meeting. Neither the organization administering the offsite stabling and vanning program nor any of the entities that form and operate
 the organization, except an entity actually engaged in vanning horses, is liable for any injury occurring to any individual or horse during vanning from an offsite stabling facility.

(c) The auxiliary offsite stabling facilities and amenities provided for offsite stabling and training purposes shall be substantially equivalent in character to those provided by the thoroughbred racing association or fair conducting the racing meeting.

(d) In order to ensure the long-term availability of facilities for offsite stabling and training, the organization may enter into multiyear contracts for
 auxiliary facilities in the northern zone. The organization shall submit to the board for its approval multiyear contracts it enters into with providers of auxiliary facilities for the offsite stabling and training. Contracts not disapproved by the board within 60 days of submittal to the board shall be deemed to have been approved by the board. Once a multiyear contract has been approved by the board, it shall be considered to have been approved for its duration.

(e) At the request of the board, the organization shall submit a report detailing all of its
 receipts and expenditures over the prior two fiscal years and, upon request of any party within the organization, those receipts and expenditures shall be audited by
 an independent third party selected by the board at the expense of the organization.

(f) In addition to the uses of the funds described in subdivisions (a) and (b), the organization may use those funds to do both of the following:

(1) Maintain a reserve fund of up to 10 percent of the total estimated annual vanning and auxiliary offsite stabling
 costs. In addition to the reserve fund, if the funds generated for the auxiliary offsite stabling facilities and vanning are insufficient to fully cover the expenses incurred, the organization may, in the future, accumulate sufficient funds to fully cover those expenses.

(2) Pay back commissions, purses, and owners’ premiums to the extent the deductions made pursuant to Section 19607.2 exceed in any year the amount of funds necessary to achieve the objectives of the organization.

(g) The amount initially deducted and distributed to the organization pursuant to Section 19607.2 may be adjusted by the board, in its discretion. However, the adjusted amount
 shall not exceed 2 percent of the total amount handled by satellite wagering facilities. The amount deducted and distributed to the organization as adjusted by the board may be a different percentage of the handle for different associations and fairs conducting thoroughbred racing meetings in the northern zone, but only if all the associations and fairs agree to the differing percentages.

(h) A thoroughbred racing association or fair in the northern zone that the board determines is able to provide the minimum number of stalls required by its racing meeting license without the use of any auxiliary offsite stabling and training facility and vanning program may opt out of that program, in which case the deduction described in Section 19607.2 shall not apply during the live racing meeting conducted by
 the association or fair until such time as the association or fair opts back into the auxiliary offsite stabling and training facility and vanning program. Any thoroughbred racing association or fair in the northern zone that opts out of the auxiliary offsite stabling and training facility and vanning program shall not have any voting interest therein until such time as the association or fair opts back into the program. The organization shall establish reasonable procedures and timelines for the giving of notice to the organization by a thoroughbred racing association or fair that elects to opt out of the auxiliary offsite stabling and training facility and vanning program.

(i) The board shall reserve the right to adjudicate any disputes that arise regarding costs, or other matters, relating to the furnishing of offsite
 stabling or vanning. Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall maintain all powers necessary and proper to ensure that offsite stabling and vanning, as provided for in this chapter is conducted in a manner that protects the public and serves the best interests of horse racing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 562, Sec. 4.   (AB 2011)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19607.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any amount up to an amount equal to the difference between the maximum deduction authorized pursuant to Sections 19607 and 19607.2 and the amount actually deducted, not to exceed four million dollars ($4,000,000) statewide annually, may be utilized to obtain, provide, or defray the cost of workers’ compensation coverage for licensed thoroughbred stable employees and jockeys, and an amount not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) statewide annually, may be paid to the thoroughbred welfare fund described in subdivision (b) of Section 19641 from the funds described in Sections 19607 and 19607.2, provided (1) there is a written agreement between the owners’ organization described in subdivision (a) of Section 19613 and those racing associations and fairs that annually conduct in California at least 75 percent of the thoroughbred races regarding the utilization of those funds; and (2) the agreement is filed with the board.

(b) The agreement shall be binding upon the owners’ organization and all of the racing associations and fairs that conduct thoroughbred races in California and the board shall have the authority to enforce the terms of the agreement. The board shall not, however, have the authority to impose an agreement upon the owners’ organization or the group of racing associations or fairs described herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 922, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19607.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if both a fair and a thoroughbred association are licensed by the board to conduct live racing meetings within the northern zone during the same calendar period, signals of both racing programs shall be accepted at each live racing meeting within the northern zone and at all satellite wagering facilities eligible to receive these programs.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to ensure that fairs which previously had an exclusive right to send their signals to satellite wagering facilities in the northern zone during periods of overlap do not lose commission revenues from satellite wagering, each fair that conducts its meeting during the period described in subdivision (a) shall receive the
 following satellite wagering commissions:

(1) With respect to the 2nd District Agricultural Association in Stockton, the commissions payable to the fair from satellite wagering during the period described in subdivision (a) shall be the greater of any of the following:

(A) The actual commission earned by the fair from satellite wagering on its live races during that period.

(B) Fifty percent of the total combined satellite wagering commissions payable to the thoroughbred association and the fair during that period.

(C) One hundred ten percent of the satellite wagering commissions paid to the fair during its live racing meeting in 1990.

If the satellite wagering commissions received by the 2nd District
 Agricultural Association are less than the greater of the amounts specified in subparagraph (B) or (C), the thoroughbred association shall pay to the fair from amounts deducted from satellite wagering on its meeting and before distribution of any satellite wagering commissions and purses on its meeting, an amount equal to the difference between the actual satellite wagering commissions received by the fair in that year and the applicable amount from subparagraph (B) or (C). No additional satellite wagering commission shall be paid to the fair by an association unless the fair conducts live racing during the period described in subdivision (a).

(2) With respect to the California Exposition and State Fair in Sacramento, the commissions payable to the fair from satellite wagering during the period described in subdivision (a) shall be the greater of either of the following:

(A) The
 actual commission earned by the fair from satellite wagering on its live races during that period.

(B) Sixty percent of the total combined satellite wagering commissions payable to the thoroughbred association and the fair during that period.

If the satellite wagering commissions received by the California Exposition and State Fair are less than the amount described in subparagraph (B), the thoroughbred association shall pay to the fair from amounts deducted from satellite wagering on its meeting and before distribution of any satellite wagering commissions and purses on its meeting, an amount equal to the difference between the actual satellite wagering commissions received by the fair in that year and the amount described in subparagraph (B). No additional satellite wagering commission shall be paid to the fair by an association unless the fair conducts live racing during the period described in
 subdivision (a).

(c) During any periods described in subdivision (a), including periods of overlap for fairs not specified in subdivision (b), the thoroughbred association shall deduct the same percentage from the total amount wagered in its daily conventional and exotic parimutuel pools as the percentage deducted by the fair meeting. The amounts deducted shall be distributed as otherwise provided in this article, with the following exceptions:

(1) If the percentages deducted from the conventional and exotic parimutuel pools of the thoroughbred association under this subdivision exceed the percentages deducted from the association’s pools during periods other than those described under subdivision (a), the amount deducted which is equivalent to the difference between those percentages shall be distributed by the thoroughbred association equally between commissions and purses.

(2) If a thoroughbred association and the 2nd District Agricultural Association in Stockton or the California Exposition and State Fair in Sacramento both conduct live racing meetings during any period described in subdivision (a), the total amount deducted shall be distributed by both the association and fair in the percentages specified for fair meetings in subdivision (b) of Section 19605.7.

This subdivision does not require any portion of the additional deduction to be distributed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19614.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an association and fair that conduct their meeting pursuant to subdivision (b) shall combine the operating expenses incurred at satellite wagering facilities during the period described in subdivision (a). For purposes of this subdivision only, the combined satellite
 wagering operating expenses of the association and the fair during the period described in subdivision (a) shall not exceed the actual expenses, or 6 percent of the combined parimutuel pool at satellite wagering facilities, whichever amount is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 4.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.

An association other than a fair that conducts a horseracing meeting with an average daily handle of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) or more shall produce a live audiovisual signal of its racing program and shall make this signal available, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 19605.3 to any satellite wagering facility authorized to conduct wagering pursuant to Section 19605, 19605.1, 19605.2, or 19605.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 671, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.1.

Unless the board finds it impractical to do so, any fair or any association with an average daily handle of less than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) may produce, at its option, a live audiovisual signal of its racing program. If the fair or association produces a signal of its program, the signal shall be made available, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 19605.3 to any satellite wagering facility authorized to conduct wagering pursuant to Section 19605, 19605.1, 19605.2, or 19605.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 131, Sec. 15.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.2.

(a) In order to permit associations providing audiovisual signals the ability to do so without undue burden and expense, to avoid unnecessary duplication of facilities, to permit the associations to protect the security of their signals, and to permit the associations to protect the integrity of their parimutuel pools and to account for wagering proceeds included in those parimutuel pools, associations and fairs providing audiovisual signals pursuant to Section 19608 or 19608.1 may form an organization to operate, pursuant to board supervision, the audiovisual signal system.

(b) An organization operating under board supervision pursuant to this section may consist of any combination of associations and fairs.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes any other person or business entity from participating in, or holding a financial interest in, an organization formed by associations or fairs to operate satellite wagering, except that the person or business entity shall be approved by the board.

(d) Any organization formed shall provide horsemen’s organizations contracting with associations and fairs for racing meetings and nonracing fairs operating satellite wagering facilities meaningful representation on its governing board, and shall administer the audiovisual signal and parimutuel operations at satellite wagering facilities.

(e) (1) An organization shall bear the costs of operating the audiovisual signal system, including the costs of leasing or purchasing and operation of equipment for transmission and decoding of audiovisual signals and wagering data, the costs of totalisator equipment, mutuel department labor and equipment charges, and the costs, including labor, and overhead of the organization administering the satellite wagering program.

(2) A satellite wagering facility shall bear the costs of satellite receiving dishes, head-end assemblies, television monitors or screens, facility buildings, labor at the satellite wagering facility other than mutuel department labor, and any and all other costs at the satellite wagering facility not specifically referred to in paragraph (1).

(3) The board shall approve all costs and resolve any differences between an organization and a satellite wagering facility as to which party is required to bear the costs for a disputed item.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 131, Sec. 15.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.3.

(a) Funds allocated by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 19606.1 for fire and life safety improvement projects, California Code of Regulations compliance projects, and long-term deferred maintenance projects at fairs in the northern zone shall be allocated in accordance with a project schedule determined by the Department of Food and Agriculture in compliance with this section.

(b) The department shall prepare a three-year schedule of these projects which commences July 1, 1987, and shall annually update the schedule. The schedule shall list individual project costs, contain a project description, and specify estimated
 project completion dates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 2, Sec. 5.   (AB 95)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.4.

A satellite wagering facility, an organization established pursuant to Section 19608.2 or any of their subcontractors or entities under contract to perform any of the functions specified in this article shall, as a condition of operating, enter into a written contractual agreement with the bona fide labor organization which has historically represented the same or similar classifications of employees at the nearest horseracing meeting. Permanent state or county employees and nonprofit organizations who have historically performed certain services at county, state, or agricultural district fairs may continue to provide those services notwithstanding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 131, Sec. 15.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.5.

All revenues payable to the state and deposited in a separate account in the fund pursuant to Section 19606.1 that are allocated by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture for the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19606.1 are hereby pledged for the repayment of the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued by a joint powers agency, or of other debt service or expense incurred for the purposes described in that paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.6.

(a) Any joint powers agency requesting money in connection with the issuance of bonds for the purposes described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19606.1 shall file an application with the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, in the form required by the secretary.

(b) The secretary shall, upon review of the applications, prepare a statement of allocation of money to the joint powers agency, in the priority the director deems appropriate.

(c) The secretary shall adopt regulations governing the allocation procedures to be followed in implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.7.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting Sections 19608.5, 19608.6, and 19608.8 to provide the revenues necessary for the financing by joint powers agencies of the described facilities and projects which shall be deemed to be public capital improvements within the meaning of Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. Deposits into the account in the fund in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19606.1 shall continue through and including either the 20th year after the initial calendar year in which the revenues are collected, or whatever period of time is necessary to repay any borrowings of joint powers funding mechanism, including, but not limited to, retirement of bonded indebtedness, loan repayments, and monthly payments involving lease-purchase programs made by a joint powers agency to finance described facilities and projects, whichever time is longer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 131, Sec. 15.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

19608.8.

The State of California does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds or other indebtedness issued, and with those joint powers agencies which may enter into project agreements with fairs or other third parties or authorize bonds or other indebtedness to be issued, in reliance on the allocations set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 19606.1, that the state will not alter or change the structure of funding and deposits set forth in, or the pledge of funds for debt service, security, including any coverage factors, and expenses, pursuant to that section until the bonds and other indebtedness are fully paid or discharged and the project is fully performed or discharged. However, nothing precludes any alteration or change, if and when, adequate provision has been made by law for the protection from impairment of the contracts represented by the bonds, other indebtedness and projects, and the right to so alter or change is hereby reserved. Joint powers agencies may include this pledge and undertaking of the state in the bonds, agreements evidencing other indebtedness, and project agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 131, Sec. 15.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. License Fees, Commissions, and Purses [19610. - 19619.7.]

19610.

Every association which conducts a racing meeting shall deduct 15 percent of the total amount handled in conventional parimutuel pools and 16.75 percent of the total amount handled in exotic parimutuel pools, except that any association conducting a harness racing meeting shall deduct 17.75 percent of the total amount handled in exotic parimutuel pools. The amounts as deducted shall be distributed as prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1739, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

19610.1.

Every association which conducts a harness racing meeting and deducts 17.75 percent of the total amount handled in exotic parimutuel pools shall use 1 percent of the total amount handled in the exotic parimutuel pools to fund the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program. The 1 percent shall be deposited into the separate trust account provided for in Section 19619.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1739, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

19610.2.

Every association that conducts a racing meeting shall deduct one-tenth of 1 percent of the total amount handled. From the amount deducted on wagers made on-track, thirty-three one hundredths of the amount deducted shall be distributed to the Center for Equine Health and shall supplement, and not supplant, other funding sources. Sixty-seven one hundredths of the amount deducted shall be distributed to the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory to fund the equine drug testing program and laboratory at the University of California, Davis described in
 Section 19578.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19610.3.
